src/phonology/otw-phon.xfscript
! non-digraph relies on parens: [a (a)] ... is match greedy?
!for loans that don't syncopate (but may take morphology), consider writing vowels with special characters to escape syncope (or any other phonology that they need not take)
!could also translate loans into generic STEM+special char, then have loan word continuation lexica that spell out specific classes of loans by their phonological behavior

! important note (possibly): *sVh->sh != *sh for histo vowel deletion
define bound [%<|%>|%^|%*];
define sigma [
                b|d|g|p|t|k|
                j|c h|
                z (h)|s (h)|
                m|n|
                w|y|
                %'|h|
                a|i|o|e|
                a1| !a1>C -> a>C, a1>e1 -> >e, a1>a -> aa>, else: 0 (pl/obv not lengthened, dim quality not affected, otherwise, long a appears before suffixes, else: delete)
                i1| !i1> -> ii>, else: 0 (long i before all suffixes, else: delete) 
                i2| !i2 -> i (PA *i, trigger for palatalization)
                i3| !triggers w4 deletion: w4 -> 0 / i3 C V C _
                e1| !e1n[h|s|y] -> en[h|s|y], else: i (PA short *e, short for purposes of coalescence rule)
                o1| !behaves exactly like o is expected to act... where does it appear in morph output? -> not in nouns!
                o3| !used for nouns that end in <o>
                w1| !w1[i|e1] -> o, (Odawa) w1a -> o, w1a -> wa, else: 0 (abstract w for PA labiovelars gw, kw, found in noun plurals) must be special char because velar-w clusters exist that do not undergo these rules (agwinde) (possibly could enforce morpheme boundary sensitivity if we wanted to get rid of w1 distinction)
                w2| !w2[n|#] -> 0, else: w (appears in nouns that synchronically end in i, form wag plurals)
                w3| !w3 -> 0 / C _, _C, _# (only surfaces in hiatus appears in negation)
                w4| !w4 surfaces pre-vocalically, sometimes as o (appears (primarily?) in cnj dub)
                w5| ![n|m]w5>a[n|g] -> [n|m]oa[n|g]->[n|m]oo[n|g], w5>goba -> >goba, else: w (VAI independent 3 infl)
                w6| !amw eat= amwaa, amo
                y1| !y1->0 (trigger for palatalization in participles, vowel raising in participles)
                y2| !y2->y mooday, jiibay have a y that doesn't delete like a good little glide
                s1| !s1->sh / _ i2
                m1| !m1->a / _ [m|n] (comp len in vti)
                m2| !m2-> [alpha place] / _ [b|d], or optionally deletes (also blocks syncope, make it add a vowel) this appears in loans with initial voiced stops
                n1| !n1->zh / _ i2 (appears in vtas)
                n2| !n2->0 / _ .#. (appears in inflectional morphemes)
                n3| !n3->0 / _ \.#. (appears after some negations)
                n4| !n4->n / (non comp len in vti)
                n5| !n5->en / lexically specific d-initial ccnj, else 0 
                b1| !d1b1 -> p (cnj preterites)
                d1| !nd1 -> ng, d1b1 -> p, d1y1 -> j, else: d 
                d2| !deletable d in vii, also for complex numerals
                c1| !conjunct, negation linker (nasal-neg[s] -> nz, v-v -> vyv)
                L1| !final vowel protector (used mostly on a handful of loans, hence the L, but also a couple of tightly bound compounds with aki, and miikna)
                X2| !'segment' to allow special phonology in ccnjs
                Va1| !Valen special char, instant remap: a lowered from o
                Vi1| !Valen special char, instant remap: a that in other dialects is i
                Vv1| !Valen special char, instant remap: unknown short vowel
                Vo1| !Valen special char, instant remap: o/wa variation
                Vo2| !Valen special char, instant remap: a that in other dialects is o, but is [e] in initial change (/o/ is [we] in initial change, /a/ is [e] in initial change)
                Vo2| !Valen special char, instant remap: a that in other dialects is o, but is [e] in initial change (/o/ is [we] in initial change, /a/ is [e] in initial change)
                Bv1| !Bowers special char, instant remap: vowel to supply missing vowel at beginning of lexrep (fixes oversyncopation for the moment)
                "PV/CCNJ+"| !marks changed conjunct form
                CRED1|  !reduplicant consonant
                VRED1  !reduplicant vowel
            ]; 
define cons [
                b|d|g|p|t|k|
                j|c h|
                z (h)|s (h)|
                m|n|
                w|y|
                %'|h|
                w1| 
                w2|
                w3|
                w4|
                w5|
                w6|
                y1| 
                y2| 
                s1| 
                m1|
                n1| 
                n2| 
                n3| 
                n4| 
                b1|
                d1|
                d2
                !c1 !primary role is an inserted hiatus breaker. underlying presence w/ designation as consonant triggers vowel insertion rules (not desired)
            ]; 
define cseqs [[
                b|d|g|p|t|k|h|
                j|c h|
                [z (h)]|[s (h) (p|t|k)]|
                [m (b)]|[n (d|[z (h)]|j|g|h|s|y|y1)]
               ](w)|
                %'|w|y|
                [g|k]w2|
                w1|w5|y1|y2|s1|m1|n1|n2|n3|n4|b1|d1|d2
            ]; 
define codaseqs [
                b|d|g|p|t|k|
                j|[c h]|
                [z (h)]|[s (h) (p|t|k)]|
                [m (b)]|[n (d|[z (h)]|j|g|h|s|y)]|
                w|y|h|
                w1|w5|y1|y2|m1|n1|n2|n3|n4|s1|b1|d1|d2
                ]; 
define longv [a a|e|i i|o o];
define shortv [a|i|o|e1|o3]; !all other abstract vowels to [aio] by time relevant? should this bar following vowel, otherwise will match first grapheme of long vowel.
!define trushortv [a \[a]|i \[i]|o \[o]|e1]; !all other abstract vowels to [aio] by time relevant? should this bar following vowel, otherwise will match first grapheme of long vowel.
define shortvsurface [a|i|o]; 
define absv [a1|i1|i2|i3|o1|e1|o3];
define vowel [a (a)|i (i)|o (o)|e|a1|i1|i2|i3|o1|o3|e1];
define nastrig [n [h|y|s]];

define nas [n|n2|m|m1];  !should the other nasals be here (n4?, m2?)

!special y for raising a (-naan-ag -> naanig, -e1ny-ag-> enyig, -dy-ag (preterites) -> jig)

!remapping rule to purge special vowels
define rmspecialv [
                    Va1 -> o ,
                    Vi1 -> a ,
                    Vv1 -> i ,
                    Vo1 -> w a ,
                    Vo2 -> a ,
                    Bv1 -> i 
                ];


!####
!#rules that require morpheme boundary reference
!####
!{ morph bound
!{dependent stems 
define preGli [ o -> w || _ %< %^ vowel ]; !Bloomfield talks about this, and it appears in wiij... words. in a lot of cases the o- just seems to delete  (which we can get with 3+Nul)
define preDel [ shortv -> 0 || _ %< %^ vowel ];  
!}
!{prefix adjustments
define optinitV [shortv (->) 0 || _ %< shortv cons ] ; !comment this rule for post-rhythmic syncope stage, could use trushortv
define preLen [ [..] -> o || shortv %< _ o ];
define preNas [
                [ [..] (->)  n || n i _ %< [d|g|b] ] .o.
                [ n (->) m || n i _ %< b] .o.
                [ n (->) 0 || _ i [n|m] %< [d|g|b]]
                ];
define preEpen [ [..] ->  d || shortv _ %< vowel ];
!}
define conDimMutation [[m|n] (->) 0 || _ %> e1 n [y|s] ] ; 
define conPl [ shortv (->) i || e1 n y %>  _ ]; !would be nice to have y1 here, but then it is the only y1 that doesn't delete !DAB 2023 this duplicates a ya->yi rule we have more generally in spelling relaxation !DAB 2024 CONTRA VALENTINE 2001:190, this is apparently optional, since we have many lexical contemptives in the corpus with enyan/enyag, and also some (apparently derived) contemptives with enyan: bnenyan from AM

define a1toshort    [a1 %> a  ->  a %>] ;
define a1toe        [a1 %> e1  -> %> e] ;
define a1tolong     [a1 %>  ->  a a %>] ;
define i1tolong     [i1 %>  ->  i i %>] ;

define ordAssim     [nas -> m || _ %> b1 ,, !cnj prets have assim, no epenthesis
                    nas -> n ||
                                _ c1 %> [s|z|d|d1|j|g] , !cnj neg, else assim
                                _ %> k !VAI, VTI imperatives are only affixes beginning with k
                    ] ; 
define awiCoalescence [ a w [%> (%>)] i -> o o || \[a] _ [m|n|k w a a] .o. !consonantal sonorants and ikwaa cnj Thm2b+3Pl(see Kaye 1971, Piggott 1980 Ch 3.4, p. 300, further remarks in conclusion)
                        a w [%> (%>)] [i|i2] -> a a || \[a] _ [p|b|t|d|k|g|j|c h]  !non-continuants
                        ]; 
define NC           [%> k -> g || n _ ] ; !VAI VTI imperatives [m|n]k -> ng
define cnjD1Gnasstem [ d1 -> g || nas c1 %>  _ ] ;
define partexcise   [ y1 -> 0 || d1 _ w4, d1 _ %> b1 ] ; !keep d1 next to special mode consonants so d1 -> g / _ w4 (cnjd1w4), d1b1 -> p (cnjD1p)
define cnjD1p       [d1 -> p || \[nas] _  %> b1 ]; !fortition for pret
define cnjpb1       [b1 -> 0 || p %>  _ ]; !cleaning up fortition
define cnjnegsig    [ [..] -> w4 || s i w3 %> d1 _ .#. ] ; !3Sg neg # -> sig *sid
define cnjd1w4      [ d1 -> g || _ w4 ] ; !d1 (third person) turns to g before dub
                                            !precedes w4 -> o, could d1 -> g || _ o/wwork?
!define cnj21dubw    [ [..] -> w || w4 %> a n g _ %> ] ; !close reading of Valentine 2001 shows 21pl dub has an extra w, Rand suspects this is an error.
define cnjo      [      w y1 a -> o .o. !for iteratives
                        w -> o || [e|[a n]] g _ %> b1 ,, !2pl, 21pl w -> o (prt)
                        w4 -> o || _ %> b1 ]; !ditto for w4 (w4b1 only third person)
define cnjW3w       [w3 -> w || _ %> vowel] ; !w3 only appears in hiatus (why req morph bound?)
define cnjW3del     [w3 -> 0] ; !else: delete
define cnjrmbound   [ %> -> 0 ||  m _ b1, nas c1 _ z ]; !making sure no epenthesis in assim cases
define cnjaepen     [[..] -> a || nas c1 _ w4 , !a epen for nas-final
                                  [nas|d2] c1 %>  _  g [w4|o], !d1w4 *= labiovelar gw? 
                                  d2 c1 %> _ g %> b !DAB 2023 added d2 bc shkwaakmigd_a_gba, a preterite form
                                  ] ; 
define w5o          [w5 -> o || cons _ %> a [n|g]] ; !feed oa->oo ... expanded to cons _ from nas _ to accomodate VII Cwan->Coon
define w5del          [w5 -> 0 || _ %> [ [g o b a]|[n o o n] ] ] ; !bleed ccEpen
define w5w          [w5 -> w] ; !doesn't require morph bound, but kept it here for contiguity with other w5 rules
define mgAssim      [m %> %> g -> n g,,
                     [n|m] %> %> d -> n d
                     ] ; !antipassive -ge does not trigger epenthesis, rather it triggers assimilation (Valentine p 405), same for reciprocal/reflexive di/dizo
define noomagad     [[..] -> o o || nas _ %> %> m a g a d2] ; !bleed ccEpen
define vLenmagad    [[..] -> i || \[i] i _ %> %> m a g a d2 ,, 
                    [..] -> o || \[o] o _ %> %> m a g a d2 ,,
                    [..] -> a || \[a] a _ %> %> m a g a d2 ] ;

define n2y1del [ n2 y1 -> 0 || _ %> b a n2 ]; !has to bleed n2del

define ccEpen [[..] -> i || cons _ %> cons , !these [i's] probably condition palatalization -> not in noun stems, so can't put i2 here and then trigger td palatalization, EF: seems like you could just remove the suffix boundary and this would work for a bunch of Cnj order [ang]s, though maybe it should be cseqs rather than cons so as to avoid insertion between [n] and [g], or maybe you make n (g) a consonant, but I don't know how the optionality works there 
                            nas c1 _ %> nas .o.
                [..] -> i2 || cons  %> %> _ cons !palatalization conditioned w/ deriv suffixes like gaazo, so restrict i2 to occur with these suffixes ... not sure if N or S palatalize with all of these
                            ]; !workaround for conjunct order

define rmBound [[%>|%<|%^] -> 0]; 
!} end morph bound
